Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-17,106
Rules and regulations.

The department, in conjunction with approved nursing programs, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nursing Student Loan Act. In conformance with such rules and regulations, institutions with approved nursing programs may act as agents of the department for the distribution of the loans to eligible students. The department may contract with outside sources to carry out the act.

Laws 2001, LB 468, § 6.